Hawaii statutes.
[§463E-10] Perjury. Any person who
wilfully and knowingly makes under oath any false statement in connection with
any proceeding before the board shall be guilty of perjury and shall be subject
to the penalty prescribed by law for perjury. Whenever the board is satisfied
that the witness has committed perjury in any proceeding before the board, it
shall report the same to the prosecuting officer of the county in which the
perjury took place, who shall prosecute the witness for perjury. [L 1973, c 80,
pt of §1]

Cross References

Perjury and related offenses, see chapter 710, pt V.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next